Utah statutes.
48-2c-901 (Repealed 07/01/13).   Form of contribution.

The contribution of a member to the company may consist of cash, property, services rendered, or a promissory note or other binding obligation to contribute cash or property or to perform services, or any combination of the foregoing.



Enacted by Chapter 260, 2001 General Session 

Repealed by Chapter 353, 2011 General Session

